Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202560-3,104
Types of license plates.

The department shall issue the following types of license plates:

(1) Alternate license plates issued pursuant to sections 60-3,163, 60-3,163.01, and 60-3,163.02;

(2) Amateur radio station license plates issued pursuant to section 60-3,126;

(3) Apportionable vehicle license plates issued pursuant to section 60-3,203;

(4) Autocycle license plates issued pursuant to section 60-3,100;

(5) Boat dealer license plates issued pursuant to section 60-379;

(6) Bus license plates issued pursuant to section 60-3,144;

(7) Commercial motor vehicle license plates issued pursuant to section 60-3,147;

(8) Dealer or manufacturer license plates issued pursuant to sections 60-3,114 and 60-3,115;

(9) Disabled veteran license plates issued pursuant to section 60-3,124;

(10) Farm truck license plates issued pursuant to section 60-3,146;

(11) Farm trucks with a gross weight of over sixteen tons license plates issued pursuant to section 60-3,146;

(12) Former military vehicle license plates issued pursuant to section 60-3,236;

(13) Gold Star Family license plates issued pursuant to sections 60-3,122.01 and 60-3,122.02;

(14) Handicapped or disabled person license plates issued pursuant to section 60-3,113;

(15) Historical vehicle license plates issued pursuant to sections 60-3,130 to 60-3,134;

(16) Local truck license plates issued pursuant to section 60-3,145;

(17) Metropolitan utilities district license plates issued pursuant to section 60-3,228;

(18) Military Honor Plates issued pursuant to sections 60-3,122.03 and 60-3,122.04;

(19) Minitruck license plates issued pursuant to section 60-3,100;

(20) Motor vehicle license plates for motor vehicles owned or operated by the state, counties, municipalities, or school districts issued pursuant to section 60-3,105;

(21) Motor vehicles exempt pursuant to section 60-3,107;

(22) Motorcycle license plates issued pursuant to section 60-3,100;

(23) Nonresident owner thirty-day license plates issued pursuant to section 60-382;

(24) Organizational license plates issued pursuant to sections 60-3,104.01 and 60-3,104.02;

(25) Passenger car having a seating capacity of ten persons or less and not used for hire issued pursuant to section 60-3,143 other than autocycles;

(26) Passenger car having a seating capacity of ten persons or less and used for hire issued pursuant to section 60-3,143 other than autocycles;

(27) Pearl Harbor license plates issued pursuant to section 60-3,122;

(28) Personal-use dealer license plates issued pursuant to section 60-3,116;

(29) Personalized message license plates for motor vehicles, trailers, and semitrailers, except motor vehicles, trailers, and semitrailers registered under section 60-3,198, issued pursuant to sections 60-3,118 to 60-3,121;

(30) Prisoner-of-war license plates issued pursuant to section 60-3,123;

(31) Public power district license plates issued pursuant to section 60-3,228;

(32) Purple Heart license plates issued pursuant to section 60-3,125;

(33) Recreational vehicle license plates issued pursuant to section 60-3,151;

(34) Repossession license plates issued pursuant to section 60-375;

(35) Special interest motor vehicle license plates issued pursuant to section 60-3,135.01;

(36) Trailer license plates issued for trailers owned or operated by the state, counties, municipalities, or school districts issued pursuant to section 60-3,106;

(37) Trailer license plates issued for trailers owned or operated by a metropolitan utilities district or public power district pursuant to section 60-3,228;

(38) Trailer license plates issued pursuant to section 60-3,100;

(39) Trailer license plates issued pursuant to section 60-3,151;

(40) Trailers exempt pursuant to section 60-3,108;

(41) Transporter license plates issued pursuant to section 60-378;

(42) Trucks or combinations of trucks, truck-tractors, or trailers that are not for hire and engaged in soil and water conservation work and used for the purpose of transporting pipe and equipment exclusively used by such contractors for soil and water conservation construction license plates issued pursuant to section 60-3,149; and

(43) Well-boring apparatus and well-servicing equipment license plates issued pursuant to section 60-3,109.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 104;

Laws 2006, LB 663, § 23;

Laws 2007, LB286, § 37;

Laws 2007, LB570, § 7;

Laws 2009, LB110, § 2;

Laws 2010, LB650, § 26;

Laws 2012, LB216, § 3;

Laws 2014, LB383, § 5;

Laws 2015, LB45, § 2;

Laws 2015, LB220, § 5;

Laws 2015, LB231, § 12;

Laws 2016, LB474, § 7;

Laws 2016, LB783, § 7;

Laws 2016, LB977, § 6;

Laws 2017, LB46, § 5;

Laws 2017, LB263, § 36;

Laws 2018, LB909, § 59;

Laws 2019, LB138, § 8;

Laws 2019, LB156, § 9;

Laws 2019, LB356, § 7;

Laws 2020, LB944, § 18;

Laws 2021, LB166, § 5;

Laws 2021, LB317, § 5;

Laws 2024, LB140, § 5;

Laws 2025, LB398, § 20.